src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/pronouns_gt-desc.ana.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Pronoun - independent pronouns - ok : # test for independent pronouns
    laa'+Indep+SetB.Sg1: laa'in
    laa'+Indep+SetB.Sg2: laa'at
    a'an+Indep+Sg3: a'an
    a'an+Indep+Pl3: a'aneb'
    laa'+Indep+SetB.Pl1: laa'oo
    laa'+Indep+SetB.Pl2: laa'ex
